Washington statutes.
RCW 41.06.098

Puget Sound partnership—Certain personnel exempted from chapter.

In addition to the exemptions under RCW 41.06.070, the provisions of this chapter shall not apply in the Puget Sound partnership to the executive director, to one confidential secretary, and to all professional staff.

[ 2007 c 341 s 45.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2007 c 341: See RCW 90.71.907.